Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB921.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 809.3. Surgical smoke evacuation systems.(a) Policy adoption.--On or before January 1, 2027, an ambulatory surgical facility or hospital shall adopt and implement policies to prevent exposure to surgical smoke through the use of a smoke evacuation system for each procedure that generates surgical smoke.(b) Compliance.--The department shall ensure compliance with 12345678910111213141516171819202122 this section during any on-site inspection and in response to any complaint received relating to a violation of this section.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Smoke evacuation system." Smoke evacuation equipment and technologies designed to capture, filter and remove surgical smoke at the site of origin and to prevent surgical smoke from making ocular contact or contact with the respiratory tract of an individual . "Surgical smoke." The surgical plume that is generated from the use of an energy-generating surgical device. The term includes smoke plume, bio-aerosols, laser-generated airborne contaminants and lung damaging dust.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0921PN1043 - 2 - 123456789101112131415